Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1525
Board; furnish utilities.

Each board may furnish heat, light, power, and other similar utilities to any facility or for any activities covered by sections 85-1515 and 85-1520 to 85-1527 without charging for the provision of such utilities against the revenue derived from such facility or activity.

Laws 1987, LB 329, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2650.13;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 47.